Missouri, session 2026, HB2968.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 478.370, 478.385, 478.387, 478.463, 478.527, 478.550, 478.570,
478.600, 478.630, 478.700, 478.705, 478.715, 478.730, 478.750, and 487.020, RSMo, are
repealed and fifteen new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 478.370,
478.385, 478.387, 478.463, 478.527, 478.550, 478.570, 478.600, 478.630, 478.700, 478.705,
478.715, 478.730, 478.750, and 487.020, to read as follows:
478.370. 1. There shall be four circuit judges in the fifth judicial circuit [consisting of
the counties of Buchanan and Andrew]. These judges shall sit in divisions numbered one,
two, three and four.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judges in
divisions one, three and four shall be elected in 1982.
478.385. There shall be four circuit judges in the seventh judicial circuit [consisting
of the county of Clay]. Beginning fiscal year 2028, there shall be five circuit judges in the
seventh judicial circuit.
478.387. There shall be twenty-four circuit judges in the twenty-second judicial
circuit [consisting of the city of St. Louis].
478.463. There shall be nineteen circuit judges in the sixteenth judicial circuit
[consisting of the county of Jackson]. These judges shall sit in nineteen divisions. Divisions
one, three, four, six, seven, eight, nine, ten, eleven, thirteen, fourteen, fifteen, and eighteen
shall sit at the city of Kansas City and divisions two, five, twelve, sixteen, and seventeen shall
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2968, 2427 & 3086 2
sit at the city of Independence. Division nineteen shall sit at both the city of Kansas City and
the city of Independence. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, the judge of the probate
division shall sit at both the city of Kansas City and the city of Independence.
478.527. 1. There shall be three circuit judges in the twenty-ninth judicial circuit
[consisting of the county of Jasper]. These judges shall sit in divisions numbered one, two
and three.
2. The circuit judge of division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judges of
divisions one and three shall be elected in 1982.
478.550. 1. There shall be four circuit judges in the twenty-third judicial circuit
[consisting of the county of Jefferson]. These judges shall sit in divisions numbered one, two,
three and four. Beginning on January 1, 2007, there shall be six circuit judges in the twenty-
third judicial district and these judges shall sit in divisions numbered one, two, three, four,
five, and six. The division eleven associate circuit judge position and the division twelve
associate circuit judge shall become circuit judge positions beginning January 1, 2007. The
division eleven associate circuit judge shall be numbered as division five and the division
twelve associate circuit judge shall be numbered as division six.
2. The circuit judge in division three shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judges in
divisions one and four shall be elected in 1982. The circuit judge in division two shall be
elected in 1984. The circuit judges in divisions five and six shall be elected for a six-year
term in 2006.
3. Beginning January 1, 2007, the family court commissioner position in the twenty-
third judicial district appointed under section 487.020 shall become an associate circuit judge
position in all respects and shall be designated as division eleven. This position may retain
the duties and responsibilities with regard to the family court. The associate circuit judge in
division eleven shall be elected in 2006 for a full four-year term. This associate circuit
judgeship shall not be included in the statutory formula for authorizing additional associate
circuit judgeships per county under section 478.320.
4. Beginning January 1, 2007, the treatment court commissioner position in the
twenty-third judicial district appointed under section 478.003 shall become an associate
circuit judge position in all respects and shall be designated as division twelve. This position
may retain the duties and responsibilities with regard to the treatment court. The associate
circuit judge in division twelve shall be elected in 2006 for a full four-year term. This
associate circuit judgeship shall not be included in the statutory formula for authorizing
additional associate circuit judgeships per county under section 478.320.
5. Beginning fiscal year 2028, there shall be one additional associate circuit
judgeship in the twenty-third judicial circuit. This associate circuit judgeship shall not
be included in the statutory formula for authorizing additional associate circuit

HCS HBs 2968, 2427 & 3086 3
judgeships per county under section 478.320. The governor shall appoint such judge,
and that judge shall serve until January 1, 2029. An associate circuit judge shall be
elected in 2028 and every four years thereafter.
478.570. 1. There shall be two circuit judges in the seventeenth judicial circuit
[consisting of the counties of Cass and Johnson]. These judges shall sit in divisions
numbered one and two.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judge in
division one shall be elected in 1982.
3. Beginning on January 1, 2006, there shall be one additional associate circuit judge
position in Cass County than is provided under section 478.320.
478.600. 1. There shall be four circuit judges in the eleventh judicial circuit. These
judges shall sit in divisions numbered one, two, three and four. Beginning on January 1,
2007, there shall be six circuit judges in the eleventh judicial circuit and these judges shall sit
in divisions numbered one, two, three, four, five, and seven. The division five associate
circuit judge position and the division seven associate circuit judge position shall become
circuit judge positions beginning January 1, 2007, and shall be numbered as divisions five and
seven. Beginning January 1, 2029, there shall be seven circuit judges in the eleventh
judicial circuit and these judges shall sit in divisions numbered one, two, three, four,
five, seven, and seventeen.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judge in
division four shall be elected in 1982. The circuit judge in division one shall be elected in
1984. The circuit judge in division three shall be elected in 1992. The circuit judges in
divisions five and seven shall be elected for a six-year term in 2006. The circuit judge in
division seventeen shall be elected in 2028 for a two-year term and thereafter in 2030 for
a six-year term and every six years thereafter.
3. Beginning January 1, 2007, the family court commissioner positions in the
eleventh judicial circuit appointed under section 487.020 shall become associate circuit judge
positions in all respects and shall be designated as divisions nine and ten respectively. These
positions may retain the duties and responsibilities with regard to the family court. The
associate circuit judges in divisions nine and ten shall be elected in 2006 for full four-year
terms.
4. Beginning on January 1, 2007, the treatment court commissioner position in the
eleventh judicial circuit appointed under section 478.003 shall become an associate circuit
judge position in all respects. Such associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2006 for a full
four-year term. This associate circuit judgeship shall not be included in the statutory formula
for authorizing additional associate circuit judgeships per county under section 478.320.

HCS HBs 2968, 2427 & 3086 4
5. Beginning in fiscal year 2015, there shall be one additional associate circuit judge
position in the eleventh judicial circuit. The associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2016.
This associate circuit judgeship shall not be included in the statutory formula for authorizing
additional circuit judgeships per county under section 478.320. Beginning in fiscal year
2019, there shall be one additional associate circuit judge position in the eleventh judicial
circuit. The associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2020. This associate circuit judgeship
shall not be included in the statutory formula for authorizing additional circuit judgeships per
county under section 478.320. Beginning fiscal year 2028, there shall be two additional
associate circuit judge positions in the eleventh judicial circuit. The associate circuit
judges shall be elected in 2028. These associate circuit judgeships shall not be included
in the statutory formula for authorizing additional circuit judgeships per county under
section 478.320.
478.630. 1. There shall be two circuit judges in the twentieth judicial circuit
[consisting of the counties of Franklin, Gasconade and Osage]. These judges shall sit in
divisions numbered one and two.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judge in
division one shall be elected in 1982.
3. Beginning fiscal year 2028, there shall be an additional associate circuit
judgeship in Franklin County. This associate circuit judgeship shall not be included in
the statutory formula for authorizing additional associate circuit judges per county as
provided under section 478.320. The governor shall appoint such judge, and that judge
shall serve until January 1, 2029. An associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2028 and
every four years thereafter.
478.700. 1. There shall be [two] three circuit judges in the twenty-fifth judicial
circuit [consisting of the counties of Maries, Phelps, Pulaski and Texas]. These judges shall
sit in divisions numbered one [and], two, and three. These judgeships shall include the
circuit judgeship created in fiscal year 2026 pursuant to section 478.330.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judge in
division one shall be elected in 1982. The circuit judge appointed by the governor in 2025
for division three shall serve until January 1, 2029. A circuit judge for division three
shall be elected in 2028 for a four-year term and in 2032 for a full six-year term and
every six years thereafter.
478.705. 1. There shall be three circuit judges in the twenty-sixth judicial circuit
[consisting of the counties of Camden, Laclede, Miller, Moniteau and Morgan]. These judges
shall sit in divisions numbered one, two, and three.
2. The circuit judge in division two shall be elected in 1980. The circuit judge in
division one shall be elected in 1982. The governor shall appoint a judge for division three

HCS HBs 2968, 2427 & 3086 5
and notwithstanding the provisions of section 105.030, that judge shall serve until January 1,
2021. A judge for division three shall be elected in 2020.
3. Beginning fiscal year 2028, there shall be one additional associate circuit
judgeship in Miller County. This associate circuit judgeship shall not be included in the
statutory formula for authorizing additional associate circuit judges per county as
provided under section 478.320. The governor shall appoint such judge, and that judge
shall serve until January 1, 2029. An associate circuit judge shall be elected in 2028 and
every four years thereafter.
478.715. 1. There shall be two circuit judges in the forty-second judicial circuit
[consisting of the counties of Crawford, Dent, Iron, Reynolds and Wayne]. These judges
shall sit in divisions numbered one and two.
2. The circuit judge in division one shall be elected in 1982. The circuit judge in
division two shall be elected in 1984.
478.730. There shall be one circuit judge in the forty-fourth judicial circuit
[consisting of the counties of Douglas, Ozark, and Wright]. The first judge to sit in this
circuit shall be appointed by the governor on January 1, 1982, and shall serve until his
successor is duly elected in 1982 and takes office on the first Monday in January of 1983.
478.750. 1. As of January 1, 1983, there shall be two circuit judges in the forty-third
judicial circuit [consisting of the counties of Clinton, Caldwell, Daviess, Livingston, and
DeKalb]. These judges shall sit in divisions numbered one and two.
2. A circuit judge shall be elected for each division in 1982. Candidates for the office
of circuit judge shall file by division.
487.020. 1. In each circuit or a county having a family court, a majority of the circuit
and associate circuit judges en banc, in the circuit, may appoint commissioners, subject to
appropriations, to hear family court cases and make findings as provided for in sections
487.010 to 487.190. Any person serving as a commissioner of the juvenile division of the
circuit court on August 28, 1993, shall become a commissioner of the family court. In each
circuit or a county therein having a family court, a majority of the circuit and associate circuit
judges en banc may appoint, in addition to those commissioners serving as commissioners of
the juvenile division and becoming commissioners of the family court pursuant to the
provisions of sections 487.020 to 487.040, no more than three additional commissioners to
hear family court cases and make findings and recommendations as provided in sections
487.010 to 487.190. The number of additional commissioners added as a result of the
provisions of sections 487.010 to 487.190 may be appointed only to the extent that the state is
reimbursed for the salaries of the commissioners as provided in sections 487.010 to 487.190
or by federal or county funds or by gifts or grants made for such purposes. A commissioner
shall be appointed for a term of four years. Commissioners appointed pursuant to sections

HCS HBs 2968, 2427 & 3086 6
487.020 to 487.040 shall serve in addition to circuit judges, associate circuit court judges and
commissioners authorized to hear actions classified under section 487.080.
2. The circuit courts in the seventh judicial circuit, the eleventh judicial circuit, the
thirteenth judicial circuit, and the thirty-first judicial circuit may, in substitution of each
family court commissioner currently appointed pursuant to this section whose salary is
reimbursable, appoint a family court commissioner whose compensation shall be payable by
the state without necessity of reimbursement. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to allow appointment of a family court commissioner in the eleventh judicial circuit
in addition to the number of such family court commissioners holding office in the eleventh
judicial circuit as of January 1, 1999. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed
to allow appointment of a family court commissioner in the thirteenth judicial circuit or the
thirty-first judicial circuit in addition to the number of such family court commissioners
holding office in such circuits as of January 1, 2013. The provisions of this subsection shall
not be construed to allow appointment of a family court commissioner in the seventh
judicial circuit in addition to the number of such family court commissioners holding
office in the seventh judicial circuit as of January 1, 2027. The appointment of the state-
paid commissioner shall be subject to appropriations for such purpose.
3. Each commissioner of the family court shall possess the same qualifications as a
circuit judge. The compensation and retirement benefits of each commissioner shall be the
same as that of an associate circuit judge, payable in the same manner and from the same
source as that of an associate circuit judge.
✔